Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 39. Commercial Driver’s License Act
§ 4111a.
Commercial learner’s permit.

Contents of permit. A commercial learner’s permit shall contain the following:

the prominent statement that the permit is a “Commercial Learner’s Permit,” except as specified in subsection 4109(a) of this title, and that it is not valid unless accompanied by a valid Vermont operator’s license;

the full name, signature, and residential address in Vermont of the permit holder;

physical and other information to identify and describe the permit holder, including the month, day, and year of birth; sex; and height;

the permit holder’s State license number;

an indication that the State of Vermont issued the permit;

the date of issuance and the date of expiration of the permit;

the group or groups of commercial motor vehicles that the permit holder is authorized to operate, indicated as follows:

A for Combination Vehicle;

B for Heavy Straight Vehicle;

C for Small Vehicle;

the endorsements for which the permit holder has qualified, if any, indicated as required under 49 C.F.R. § 383.153(b)(2)(viii); and

the restrictions placed on the permit holder, if any, indicated as follows:

P for No passengers in commercial motor vehicle bus;

X for No cargo in commercial motor vehicle tank vehicle;

L for a No Air brake equipped commercial motor vehicle;

V for medical variance;

M for No Class A passenger vehicle;

N for No Class A and B passenger vehicle;

K for Intrastate only;

Any additional restrictions that apply to the commercial learner’s permit driving privilege.

Classifications, endorsements, and restrictions.

The holder of a commercial learner’s permit may not operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials.

The holder of a commercial learner’s permit may, unless otherwise disqualified, drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the type of vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual or, in the case of a vehicle designed to transport more than 15 passengers, who occupies a seat directly behind or in the first row behind the driver and who directly observes and supervises the commercial learner’s permit holder for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.

A commercial learner’s permit holder with a passenger endorsement must have taken and passed the passenger endorsement knowledge test. A commercial learner’s permit holder with a passenger endorsement is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle carrying passengers, other than federal or state auditors and inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial driver’s license holder accompanying the commercial learner’s permit holder as prescribed in subdivision (2) of this subsection. The passenger endorsement must be class specific.
(3) (A) A commercial learner’s permit holder with a passenger endorsement must have taken and passed the passenger endorsement knowledge test. A commercial learner’s permit holder with a passenger endorsement is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle carrying passengers, other than federal or state auditors and inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial driver’s license holder accompanying the commercial learner’s permit holder as prescribed in subdivision (2) of this subsection. The passenger endorsement must be class specific.

A commercial learner’s permit holder with a school bus endorsement must have taken and passed the school bus endorsement knowledge test. A commercial learner’s permit holder with a school bus endorsement is prohibited from operating a school bus with passengers other than federal or state auditors and inspectors, test examiners, other trainees, and the commercial driver’s license holder accompanying the commercial learner’s permit holder as prescribed in subdivision (2) of this subsection.

A commercial learner’s permit holder with a tank vehicle endorsement must have taken and passed the tank vehicle endorsement knowledge test. A commercial learner’s permit holder with a tank vehicle endorsement may only operate an empty tank vehicle and is prohibited from operating any tank vehicle that previously contained hazardous materials that has not been purged of any residue.

All other federal endorsements are prohibited on a commercial learner’s permit.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 47

, § 52;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4112.
Records notification.

After suspending, revoking, or disqualifying an individual from holding a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit, the Commissioner shall update his or her records to reflect that action within 10 days. After suspending, revoking, or disqualifying a nonresident commercial driver’s privileges, the Commissioner shall notify the licensing authority of the state that issued the commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit within 10 days.

When the Commissioner receives a request for an operating record of an individual currently or previously licensed in Vermont, the Commissioner shall provide the information within 30 days.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 88

, § 11, eff. April 1, 1992;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4113.
Notification of traffic convictions.

When an individual who holds a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit issued by another state is convicted in this State of any violation of State law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, in any type of vehicle, the Commissioner shall notify the driver’s licensing authority in the licensing state of the conviction within 10 days.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 37

, § 7;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4114.
Agreements.

The Commissioner may enter into or make agreements, arrangements, or declarations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4115.
Reciprocity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an individual may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this State if the individual has a valid commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit issued by any state of the United States, any province or territory of Canada in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle driver’s licenses, or the Licensia Federal de Conductor issued by the Republic of Mexico if the individual’s license or permit is not suspended, revoked, or canceled and if the individual is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle or subject to an out-of-service order.

The Commissioner shall give all out-of-state convictions full faith and credit and treat them for sanctioning purposes under this chapter as if they occurred in this State.

The Commissioner shall record disqualifications and convictions received from other jurisdictions regarding Vermont operators.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 55

, § 9, eff. June 26, 1997;

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4116.
Disqualification.

Disqualification for one year; first violation. An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one year if convicted of a first violation of:

operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more or under the influence, as defined in section 1218 of this title;

failure to stop, as defined in section 1128 of this title;

using a motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year;

refusal to submit to a test to determine the operator’s alcohol concentration, as provided in section 1205, 1218, or 1219 of this title;

operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or under the influence of alcohol or other substance, as defined in section 1201 of this title;

operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug as provided in section 1201 of this title;

operating or attempting to operate a commercial motor vehicle while the license is revoked, suspended, cancelled, or disqualified; or

operating a commercial motor vehicle in a negligent manner resulting in a fatal injury.

Disqualification for three years; transportation of a hazardous material. An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for three years if convicted of a violation listed in subsection (a) of this section, if the violation occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded.

Disqualification for life. An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if convicted of:

two or more separate violations listed in subsection (a) of this section arising from two or more separate occurrences;

any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug where the person used a motor vehicle in the commission of the offense; or

a felony involving an act or practice of severe forms of trafficking in persons, as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 7102(11), where the person used a motor vehicle in the commission of the offense.

Disqualification for 60 or 120 days; serious traffic violation. An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 60 days if convicted of two serious traffic violations, or 120 days if convicted of a third or subsequent serious traffic violation, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period. A disqualification for 120 days shall be consecutive to any previous disqualification.

Disqualification for convictions involving a railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 60 days if the driver is convicted of a first violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation.

An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 120 days if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a second railroad-highway grade crossing violation in a separate incident.

An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one year if, during any three-year period, the driver is convicted of a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade crossing violation in separate incidents.

Surrender of license. An individual who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall surrender the individual’s Vermont commercial driver’s license not later than the effective date of the disqualification. Upon receipt of the individual’s commercial driver’s license, a Class D license shall be issued, provided the individual is otherwise eligible.

Rulemaking. The Commissioner shall adopt rules establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which a disqualification for life under this section, except for a disqualification issued pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section, may be reduced to a period of not less than 10 years.

-(j) [Repealed.]

(k)

Concurrent disqualification.

An individual shall be disqualified for a term concurrent with any disqualification or suspension issued by the administrator of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 88

, § 12, eff. April 1, 1992; amended

2003, No. 26

, § 5;

2005, No. 37

, § 8;

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2015, No. 47

, § 53;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. July 13, 2020;

2021, No. 20

, § 259;

2021, No. 76

, §§ 28, 29.

§ 4116a.
Suspension of operating privilege.

An individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Vermont shall be suspended for one year if:

the individual is convicted of a first violation of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway with an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more, or under the influence, as defined in section 1218 of this title; and

the individual’s commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit is issued by a state or country that does not have a reciprocity agreement with the State of Vermont for the disqualification of commercial driver’s licenses or permits under section 4115 of this title.

An individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Vermont shall be suspended for three years if the individual is convicted of violating subsection (a) of this section, and the violation occurred while the individual was transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded.

An individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Vermont shall be suspended for life if the individual is convicted a second time of violating subsection (a) of this section, and both convictions arise out of separate occurrences.

An individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Vermont shall be suspended for 60 days if the individual is convicted of two serious traffic violations, or for 120 days if the individual is convicted of three serious traffic violations, arising from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.

An individual’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the State of Vermont shall be suspended for life if the individual uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a regulated drug, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a regulated drug, and for which the individual was convicted.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 26; amended

2013, No. 20

, § 1;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254;

2021, No. 76

, § 30.

§ 4117.
Suspensions and disqualifications to run concurrently.

A suspension of an individual’s operating privilege or license and a disqualification imposed under section 4116 of this title, imposed for the same violation, shall run concurrently.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 88

, § 15, eff. April 1, 1992; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4118.
Effective date of disqualification; hearing.

A disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall be effective on not less than 10 days’ notice.

If requested, a hearing on the disqualification shall be conducted under sections 105-107 of this title. Except as provided in subsection 4124(a) or 4124(c) of this chapter, the scope of the hearing shall be limited to verification of the conviction.

A person aggrieved by a decision resulting from a hearing under this section may have the decision reviewed on the record under Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. The review shall be to the Washington Superior Court or, in the discretion of the licensee, to the Superior Court in the county the licensee resides or has a principal place of business.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 88

, § 16, eff. April 1, 1992; amended

2013, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 4119.
Compliance with out-of-service order; disqualification from operation of vehicle.

No individual shall operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of an out-of-service order.

Any individual convicted of violating an out-of-service order shall be disqualified as follows except as provided in subsection (c) of this section:

An individual shall be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 180 days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

An individual shall be disqualified for a period of two years if convicted of a second violation of an out-of-service order during any 10-year period, arising from separate incidents.

An individual shall be disqualified for a period of three years if convicted of a third or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any 10-year period, arising from separate incidents.

Any individual convicted of violating an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous materials or while operating a commercial motor vehicle designed or used to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver, shall be disqualified as follows:

An individual shall be disqualified for a period of 180 days if convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order.

An individual shall be disqualified for a period of three years if convicted of a second or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order during any 10-year period, arising from separate incidents.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 1996; amended

2003, No. 26

, § 6;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4120.
Penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any driver who violates or fails to comply with an out-of-service order is subject to a penalty for a first conviction or for a second or subsequent conviction at the applicable minimum level set forth in 49 C.F.R. § 383.53(b)(1), in addition to disqualification under this chapter.

Any employer who violates an out-of-service order, or who knowingly requires or permits a driver to violate or fail to comply with an out-of-service order, is subject to a penalty for a first conviction or for a second or subsequent conviction at the applicable minimum level set forth in 49 C.F.R. § 383.53(b)(2).

The fine imposed for a speeding violation of a commercial motor vehicle operating in excess of 15 miles per hour over the legally posted speed limit on any State or town highway shall be one and one-half times the fine imposed for a speeding violation in other vehicles.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Oct. 1, 1996; amended

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 4121.
Applicants for school bus endorsements.

An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall satisfy the following requirements:

Pass the knowledge and skills test for obtaining a passenger vehicle endorsement.

Have knowledge covering the following topics, at minimum:

Loading and unloading children, including the safe operation of stop signal devices, external mirror systems, flashing lights, and other warning and passenger safety devices required for school buses by State or federal law or regulation.

Emergency exits and procedures for safely evacuating passengers in an emergency.

State and federal laws and regulations related to traversing safely highway rail grade crossings.

A skills test in a school bus of the same vehicle group as the applicant will operate. As used in this subdivision (a)(2)(D), “school bus” may include a “multifunction school activity bus” as defined in section 1287 of this title.

On or before September 30, 2005, the Department of Motor Vehicles may waive the skills test required in subdivision (a)(1) of this section for an applicant who:

is currently licensed, has experience operating a school bus, and has a good operating record;

certifies, and whose certification is verified by the Department, that, during the two-year period immediately prior to applying for the school bus endorsement, the applicant:

held a valid commercial driver’s license with a passenger endorsement to operate a school bus representative of the group the applicant will be operating;

has not had his or her operator’s license or commercial driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled or been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

has not been convicted of any offense that would require disqualification under section 4116 of this title or 49 C.F.R. § 383.51(b);

has not had more than one conviction for a serious traffic violation, as defined in section 4103 of this title, while operating any type of motor vehicle;

has not had any conviction for a violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with any crash;

has not been convicted of any motor vehicle traffic violation that resulted in a crash; and

has been regularly employed as a school bus driver, has operated a school bus representative of the group the applicant seeks to operate, and provides evidence of such employment.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 37

, § 10; amended

2015, No. 50

, § 10;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254;

2021, No. 76

, § 26.

§ 4122.
Deferring imposition of sentence.

No judge or court may utilize the provisions of

13 V.S.A. § 7041

or any other program to defer imposition of sentence or judgment if the defendant holds a commercial driver’s license or was operating a commercial motor vehicle when the violation occurred and is charged with violating any State or local traffic law other than a parking violation.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 37

, § 11; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4123.
Penalty for authorizing railroad crossing violations.

Any employer who knowingly requires or permits a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of section 1076 of this title is subject to a penalty of not more than $4,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 4124.
Penalties for fraud; action upon suspected fraud.

If from the check of an applicant’s license status and record prior to issuing a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license or at any time after the commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license is issued the Commissioner determines that the applicant or holder has knowingly falsified any information, documentation, or certifications required under this chapter, the Commissioner shall give the applicant or holder notice of his or her findings and an opportunity to show cause why the application, commercial learner’s permit, or commercial driver’s license should not be disqualified for a period of 60 consecutive days. The disqualification shall be effective 10 days after the notice is sent unless the applicant or holder requests a hearing. If after a hearing the Commissioner determines that the applicant or holder has knowingly falsified any information, documentation, or certifications required under this chapter, the Commissioner shall disqualify for a period of 60 consecutive days the individual’s commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license, his or her pending application, or his or her privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

An individual convicted of fraud related to the issuance of a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license who seeks to renew, transfer, or upgrade the fraudulently obtained commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license shall be disqualified for one year. The disqualification shall be recorded in the individual’s driving record.

If the Commissioner receives credible information that a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license holder is suspected but has not been convicted of fraud related to the issuance of his or her commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license, the Commissioner shall require the holder to retake the skills or knowledge test, or both, and send the holder notice of the same. Within 30 days after notice is sent, the holder shall make an appointment or otherwise schedule to take the next available test. If the holder fails to make an appointment within 30 days, the Commissioner shall disqualify his or her commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license. If the holder fails either the knowledge or skills test or does not take the test, the Commissioner shall disqualify his or her commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license. Once a holder’s commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license has been disqualified, he or she must reapply for a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license under the procedures applicable to all commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license applicants.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.

§ 4125.
Texting violations; handheld mobile telephone violations.

Definitions. As used in this section, “driving” means operating a commercial motor vehicle on a public highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other momentary delays. “Driving” does not include operating a commercial motor vehicle with or without the motor running when the operator has moved the vehicle to the side of or off a highway and has halted in a location where the vehicle can safely remain stationary.

General prohibition on texting.

No operator shall engage in texting while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

Texting while driving is permissible by operators of a commercial motor vehicle when necessary to communicate with law enforcement officials or other emergency services.

No person may be issued traffic complaints alleging a violation of this section and a violation of section 1099 of this title from the same incident.

General prohibition on use of handheld mobile telephones.

No operator shall use a handheld mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

Use of a handheld mobile telephone is permissible by operators of a commercial motor vehicle when necessary to communicate with law enforcement officials or other emergency services.

Motor carriers.

A motor carrier shall not allow or require its drivers to engage in texting while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

A motor carrier shall not allow or require its drivers to use a handheld mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 254.